Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CLEARWATER-CLEAR LAKE FOOD SHELF.new text end new text begin $330,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Clearwater-Clear Lake Food Shelf, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, for the construction of a new food shelf building in the city of Clearwater. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end